Massachusetts, session 194th, S2431.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 29 of Chapter 93 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking the word “may” in line 10 and inserting thereof the following word:-
“shall”.
SECTION 2. Said Section 29 is hereby amended by striking the word “may” in line 11
and inserting thereof the following word:- “shall”.
SECTION 3. Said Section 29 is hereby amended by striking the sentence beginning in
line 16 and inserting in place thereof the following sentences:-
“No permit, whether permanent or temporary, for a billboard, sign or other advertising
device shall be issued unless (i) written notice of the application therefor stating the proposed
location shall have been given at least sixty days earlier to the city or town in which the proposed
of 2

billboard, sign or other advertising device is to be located, as well as to residential abutters
within 2500 feet of the proposed location, and (ii) the applicant has included plans in their
application to finance and install light blocking technology if the proposed billboard, sign, or
other advertising device employs electronic light systems.”
SECTION 4. This act shall go into effect upon its passage.
of 2